Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-375
Insurance; applicable only to insured's interest.

When the name of the party intended to be insured is specified in a policy, such insurance can be applied only to his own proper interest.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 64, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 3200;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 34, p. 602;

C.S.1922, § 7799;

C.S.1929, § 44-334;

R.S.1943, § 44-375.

A claimant under an insurance contract must show an interest in the contract that would be recognized and protected by the courts. Sayah v. Metropolitan Prop. & Cas. Ins. Co., 273 Neb. 744, 733 N.W.2d 192 (2007).

Neither family use of property nor the family relationship alone gives automatic rise to an insurable property interest. Sayah v. Metropolitan Prop. & Cas. Ins. Co., 273 Neb. 744, 733 N.W.2d 192 (2007).

To have an insurable interest, the claimant must have some legally enforceable right that would be recognized and enforced in the property at issue. Sayah v. Metropolitan Prop. & Cas. Ins. Co., 273 Neb. 744, 733 N.W.2d 192 (2007).

When no legally enforceable interest exists, no insurable interest exists. Sayah v. Metropolitan Prop. & Cas. Ins. Co., 273 Neb. 744, 733 N.W.2d 192 (2007).